Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Appeals from Revenue and Taxation Decisions of State or County Government

49.190.
KRS 49.200 to 49.250 applicable to power and authority outlined in KRS 49.020(1).

KRS

49.200

to

49.250

shall apply to the power and authority of the Board of Tax Appeals outlined in KRS 49.020(1).

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 74, § 19, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 29, effective June 29, 2021.

49.200.
Record of Board of Tax Appeals.

The Board of Tax Appeals shall maintain the following records:

A register wherein the board shall enter by its title any proceedings appealed to it according to the date of its commencement. Thereafter, until after entry of the board’s opinion and final order, there shall be noted therein according to the date, the filing or return of any paper or process or the making of any order, ruling, or other directive in or concerning such proceeding, and any other steps therein; and

The files of the board consisting of all papers or other process filed with or by the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 141, § 4; renumbered from §

131.325

by 2017 ch. 74, § 20, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 30, effective June 29, 2021.

49.210.
Location of hearings — Expenses of hearings outside offices.

The Board of Tax Appeals may hold hearings at any location within the Commonwealth, with a view to securing opportunity to taxpayers to appear before it with as little inconvenience and expense as practicable. When any member or employee of the board is attending hearings at any place other than Frankfort, Kentucky, expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of such duty shall be paid by the state upon certification by the executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals of an itemized statement of such expenses in accordance with the Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 141, § 5 (2); renumbered from §

131.335

by 2017 ch. 74, § 21, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 31, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended in 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 185, sec. 31. In that section, the existing language of subsection (2) of this statute was added nearly identically as new language to the existing language of subsection (1) of this statute, but subsection (2) was not deleted, as it is clear was the intent. In codification of this statute, the Reviser of Statutes has modified the text of this statute to eliminate the duplicative language.

49.220.
Exclusive jurisdiction of Board of Tax Appeals — Notice of rulings of revenue and taxation agencies — Appeals to board — Procedure.

The Board of Tax Appeals is vested with exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine appeals from final rulings, orders, and determinations of any revenue and taxation agency affecting revenue and taxation. Administrative hearings before the board shall be de novo and conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and administrative regulations promulgated by the board.

Any revenue and taxation agency charged with the administration of any taxing or licensing measure which is under the jurisdiction of the board shall mail by certified mail notice of its ruling, order, or determination within three (3) working days from the date of the decision.

Any party aggrieved by any ruling, order, or determination of any revenue and taxation agency charged with the administration of any taxing or licensing measure may prosecute an appeal to the board by filing a complaint or petition of appeal before the board within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing of the agency’s ruling, order, or determination.

If the Department of Revenue is aggrieved by the decision of any county board of assessment appeals on an assessment recommended by the department and prosecutes an appeal to the board as authorized in subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner of revenue shall, within twenty (20) days, certify in writing to the board the assessment recommended.

The board shall immediately forward copies of the certification to the parties to the appeal. The assessed value shall be prima facie evidence of the value at which the property should be assessed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 141, § 6; 1984, ch. 111, § 71, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 318, § 32, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 133, effective June 20, 2005; renumbered from §

131.340

by 2017 ch. 74, § 22, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 32, effective June 29, 2021.

49.230.
Official records of proceedings of Board of Tax Appeals public in nature — Exception — Appeal procedure.

The Board of Tax Appeals shall maintain the official record of the appeal, including evidence entered into the record at a hearing on the appeal, and the final action taken on each appeal. All records of proceedings shall be public records, except in cases of appeals of unmined mineral assessments where the records before the board include information provided to the Department of Revenue by the taxpayer or its lessees, and were generated at the taxpayer’s expense. Furthermore, no recorded or transcribed testimony concerning these records shall be considered a public record. Examples of these records would include, but are not limited to, mineral exploration records; photographs; core data information; maps whether acquired for ownership information, for coal seam thickness, for depletion by mining or otherwise; and /or records calculating production or reserves, leased and/or unleased. Neither records containing confidential information nor testimony concerning same shall be disclosed to parties outside the appeals proceedings. A protective order shall be entered and shall remain in effect during the entire appeals process, including appeals to the courts, and thereafter, preventing the parties, their agents and representatives, except the taxpayer, from disclosing the information.

The full board may hear an appeal or assign one (1) of its members or a hearing officer to hear an appeal. The final order in any appeal heard by a single member or a hearing officer shall be made and entered by a majority of the board. In any appeal referred to a hearing officer or one (1) member, the hearing officer or member shall tender a recommended order to the full board. The final order in any appeal heard by a single member or hearing officer shall be made and entered by a majority of the board.

In cases heard by the full board, the board may request that a hearing officer assist the board with the following:

Hear discovery issues and disputes prior to a scheduled hearing;

Receive evidence on behalf of the board during the prehearing phase in a particular case;

Make interlocutory rulings affecting the competency, relevancy, and materiality of the evidence about to be presented and upon motions presented during the taking of evidence as will expedite the preparation of the case;

Draft the final order as directed by the board; and

Perform any other duties assigned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 141, § 9; 1972, ch. 316, § 1; 1990, ch. 288, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 255, § 1, effective April 4, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 33, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 134, effective June 20, 2005; renumbered from §

131.355

by 2017 ch. 74, § 23, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 33, effective June 29, 2021.

49.240.
Effect of final orders of Board of Tax Appeals — Remand to agency — Refund.

The final orders of the Board of Tax Appeals shall be binding upon all parties until changed or modified by the courts of this state. If no appeal to the courts is prosecuted, the final order of the board shall constitute a final determination.

If the board finds that other issues are necessary to a full determination of the controversy, it may remand the whole proceeding to the agency from which the appeal was prosecuted for further determination. The parties may stipulate to the determination of the other issues without remand.

Any changes in ad valorem property tax assessment rolls, tax bills, or the application by any agency of the tax laws of the state shall be in conformity with the board’s final order.

In the case of any appeal, any taxes, interest, or penalty paid but found by the board to be in excess of that legally due shall be ordered refunded to the taxpayer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 141, § 11; 1996, ch. 318, § 34, effective July 15, 1996; renumbered from §

131.365

by 2017 ch. 74, § 24, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 34, effective June 29, 2021.

49.250.
Judicial review of final orders of Board of Tax Appeals — Stay of collection of tax.

Any party aggrieved by any final order of the Board of Tax Appeals, except on appeals from a county board of assessment appeals, may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court or to the Circuit Court of the county in which the party aggrieved resides or conducts his place of business in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Any final orders entered on the rulings of a county board of assessment appeals may be appealed in like manner to the Circuit Court of the county in which the appeal originated.

If the appeal is from an order sustaining a tax assessment, collection of the tax shall be stayed by the filing of a petition or an appeal to any court. Full payment of the tax or a supersedeas bond is not required to appeal an order sustaining a tax assessment.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 141, § 12; 1968, ch. 152, § 99; 1978, ch. 233, § 33, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 65, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 35, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 74, § 25, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 171, § 101, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 101, effective April 27, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 35, effective June 29, 2021.